Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2454.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, paragraph (j), $....... in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the renewable development account under Minnesota Statutes, section 116C.779, subdivision 1, to the commissioner of commerce to award geothermal planning grants to eligible applicants under Minnesota Statutes, section 216C.47. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end